Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1101.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. STEM and vocational teacher capacity growth pilot program; application; process; reports and summary; delayed repeal; definition A. The STEM and vocational teacher capacity growth pilot program is established in the department of education to provide paid summer internships and professional development training to eligible teachers. B. The department of education shall: 1. Establish application procedures for school districts that wish to apply to participate in the pilot program. A school district is eligible to participate in the pilot program if the school district is a high school district that meets all of the following: (a) Provides instruction to students in only grades nine through twelve. (b) Has a total student count of at least twenty-five thousand, of which: (i) At least seventy-five percent are eligible for free or reduced-price lunches. (ii) At least eighty percent are Hispanic. (c) Operates at least twenty-four school sites in a county with a population of more than four million persons. (d) Offers specialized programs in bioscience and coding and programs for gifted and talented students. 2. Select one or more school districts to participate in the pilot program beginning in the 2026-2027 school year. The department may approve applications that would result in up to fifty eligible teachers participating in the pilot program. 3. Establish policies and procedures to implement the pilot program that require each participating school to: (a) Contract with a nonprofit organization for the pilot program. (b) Submit the reports required by subsection D of this section. C. Each nonprofit organization with which a participating school district contracts pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 3, subdivision (a) of this section shall: 1. Provide professional development training, coaching sessions and opportunities for eligible teachers to engage in peer-to-peer learning. 2. Secure a paid internship for each eligible teacher at a company that operates in the eligible teacher's area of expertise. The term for internships secured pursuant to this paragraph is the summer in each of the 2026-2027, 2027-2028 and 2028-2029 school years. 3. Provide, in collaboration with local businesses, industry site visits, guest speakers, training sessions and workshops. 4. Develop and maintain an online database that includes real-time information about the pilot program's implementation, including information on teacher retention, student performance, industry engagement, budget utilization and survey results from teachers, students and local businesses. 5. Pay each eligible teacher who completes the summer training and actively participates in the pilot program at least $6,000 for each summer. D. Each participating school district shall submit the following reports to the department of education: 1. Not later than thirty days after the end of each fiscal quarter, the following information for the fiscal year: (a) The number of eligible teachers that each school district recruited and onboarded into the pilot program. (b) The change, if any, in the school district's retention rate for eligible teachers. (c) Survey results from eligible teachers regarding the pilot program onboarding and implementation. (d) A progress report regarding program implementation, including the number of professional development sessions, industry site visits, guest speakers, training sessions and workshops provided through the program. (e) The number of local businesses that provided summer internships through the program. (f) A summary of the participation and engagement of eligible teachers in the activities described in subdivision (d) of this paragraph. (g) A report on the amount of monies used during the fiscal quarter and the available balance for the remainder of the fiscal year, including a description of any differences between the proposed budget and the actual expenditures. (h) A description of barriers to program implementation and the actions taken, if any, to address the barriers. (i) A survey of eligible teachers, students and local businesses relating to the pilot program. 2. On or before June 30 and December 31 of each year, the following information covering the period since the last report submitted pursuant to this paragraph: (a) Teacher retention rates compared to the school district's teacher retention rate in the 2025-2026 fiscal year. (b) A survey of teachers regarding job satisfaction and professional development. (c) An analysis of student performance data in science, technology, engineering, mathematics and career and technical education courses. (d) A survey of students regarding student interest in science, technology, engineering, mathematics and career and technical education courses and career pathways. (e) The number of local businesses that provided summer internships through the program. (f) The number of industry site visits, guest speakers, training sessions and workshops that were provided in collaboration with local businesses. (g) The amount that eligible teachers earned through summer internships. (h) An estimate of the economic impact of the pilot program on the school, including cost savings that result from increased teacher retention. 3. Not later than August 31 of each year, the following information for the previous fiscal year: (a) An overview of the pilot program, including the school district's progress towards the program goals and objectives, eligible teacher recruitment, eligible teacher retention and professional development provided through the program. (b) A survey of eligible teachers who are participating in the pilot program regarding the efficacy of the program. (c) A comparison of the retention of eligible teachers, student performance and, beginning in 2028, the program scalability in the current year relative to the previous year. (d) Recommendations to improve the pilot program outcomes in subsequent years. 4. On or before October 31, 2029, a report on the following information for the pilot program: (a) Teacher retention and recruitment rates, including the retention rates of participating teachers and a comparative analysis of the retention rates for nonparticipating teachers. (b) Student outcomes, including long-term student performance data in science, technology, engineering, mathematics and career and technical education courses, and the impact on student enrollment, if any, in advanced courses and related programs. (c) The number of local businesses that provided summer internships through the pilot program and survey results from the local businesses. (d) A cost-benefit analysis of the pilot program, including an analysis of cost savings that result from increased teacher retention, an estimate of the economic impact of the additional compensation that teachers received through the program and the value of the professional development training provided through the program. (e) Recommendations for continuing or expanding the pilot program to other schools in this state, including any changes that may be necessary to expand the program. E. The department of education shall compile all reports that the department receives pursuant to subsection D of this section and prepare a summary of the reports.  The department shall submit the summary and reports to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate and the governor and shall provide a copy of the summary and reports to the secretary of state.  The department shall post the summary of the reports on the department's website. F. The state board of education shall allow certificated teachers to count professional development training that is provided pursuant to this pilot program as continuing education credits. G. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2030. H. For the purposes of this section, "eligible teacher" means a high school teacher who provides instruction in any combination of science, technology, engineering, mathematics and career and technical education. Sec. 2. Appropriations; department of education; disbursement; exemption A. The sum of $250,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in each of fiscal years 2026-2027, 2027-2028 and 2028-2029 to the department of education to disburse to the school districts selected to participate in the STEM and vocational teacher capacity growth pilot program established by this act. B. The appropriations made in subsection A of this section are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations, except that all monies remaining unexpended and unencumbered on June 30, 2030 revert to the state general fund.